Hawaii, session 2026, GM1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 481B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§481B- Unaffiliated and unsolicited mail and
electronic mail. (a) No entity shall distribute unsolicited
mail or electronic mail to a consumer that employs high pressure
tactics or is reasonably likely to result in the consumer
believing that the sender is affiliated with another entity that
the sender is not actually affiliated with and the entity is
asking the recipient to pay for goods, services, or forms of
legal authorization, including but not limited to:
(1) An entity representing that a vehicle manufacturer, a
new motor vehicle dealer, a used motor vehicle dealer,
or an insurance company is asking the consumer to send
money to extend a vehicle warranty or purchase a
service contract;
2026-3407 HB1511 GDI HMSO
liiiiiHiiiinnNiiiuHii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) An entity representing that a mortgage loan
originator, a mortgage loan originator company^ a
mortgage servicer, or an insurance company is asking
the consumer to send money to extend a home warranty;
or
(3) An entity representing that a federal, state, or
county government, or its agencies, employees, or
officers, is asking the consumer to send money to
renew a government-issued license or registration,
unless the entity includes a clear and conspicuous statement as
specified in subsection (b); provided that if the required
statement is not included in the unsolicited mail or electronic
mail, any contract entered into as a result of the unsolicited
mail or electronic mail shall be voidable at the, option of the
consumer, and any money paid by the consumer under the contract
shall be refunded in full.
(b) The clear and conspicuous statement required by this
section shall be printed or rendered in boldface, fourteen-point
type and located in a position reasonably calculated to draw the
attention of the reader and shall be as follows;
2026-3407 HB1511 CDl HMSO


Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Unless specifically provided otherwise in this
subsection, the statement shall be that:
(A) The entity is not affiliated with the other
entity; and
(B) The requested payment is completely optional;
If a consumer is asked to send money to extend a
vehicle warranty or purchase a service contract, the
statement shall be that:
(A) The entity is not affiliated with the vehicle
manufacturer, new motor vehicle dealer, used
motor vehicle dealer, or insurance company;
(B) The extended vehicle warranty or service contract
being offered is completely optional; and
(C) The consumer's existing benefits, rights, and
protections will not be affected by a failure to
contact the entity;
(3) If a consumer is asked to send money to extend a home
warranty, the statement shall be that:
(A) The entity is not affiliated with the mortgage
loan originator, mortgage loan originator
company, mortgage servicer, or insurance company;
2026-3407 HB1511 GDI HMSO

HliWIinilllllllllllHIII

Page 4
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(B) The home warranty being offered is completely
optional; and
(C) The consumer's existing benefits, rights^ and
protections will not be affected by a failure to
contact the entity; and
(4) If a consumer is asked to send money to renew a
government-issued license or registration, the
statement shall be that:
(A) The entity is not affiliated with the federal,
state, or county government, or its agencies,
employees, or officers;
(B) The license or registration renewal being offered
is completely optional; and
(C) The consumer's existing license or registration
will not be affected by a failure to contact the
entity.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit
an entity from distributing mail or electronic mail regarding
legitimate communications about goods, services, or forms of
legal authorization offered or managed by the entity as long as
the mail or electronic mail does not employ high pressure
2026-3407 HB1511 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO. S’?
C.D. 1
tactics and is not reasonably likely to result in the consumer
believing that the sender is affiliated with another entity to
which the entity is not actually affiliated, such as vehicle
manufacturers distributing service reminders to consumers.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit
an insurer, warranty provider, or service contract provider, or
an authorized representative of an insurer, warranty provider,
or service contract provider, from communicating with an
existing consumer regarding a policy, warranty, or service
contract issued or administered by that entity.
(e) For the purposes of this section;
"Affiliated" means a person or entity that is expressly
authorized by the insurer, warranty provider, or service
contract provider that issued the policy, warranty, or service
contract referenced in the communication, and that is acting
solely on behalf of that issuing entity in connection with the
administration, renewal, or servicing of that specific policy,
warranty, or service contract. "Affiliated" does not include a
person or entity whose relationship to the consumer arises
solely though common ownership, shared branding, marketing
arrangements, or any other indirect business relationship.
2026-3407 HB1511 GDI HMSO 5

Page 6
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Entity" means a person, firm, partnership, association^ or
corporation, or agent or employee thereof.
"High pressure tactics" means any method of marketing
having the effect of or tending to induce the remittance of
money through force, fright, or threat, whether explicit or
implied, or undue pressure.
"Mortgage loan originator" has the same meaning as defined
in section 454F-1.
"Mortgage loan originator company" has the same meaning as
defined in section 454F-1.
"Mortgage servicer" has the same meaning as defined in
section 454M-1.
"New motor vehicle dealer" has the same meaning as defined
in section 437-1.1.
"Unsolicited" means a communication sent to a recipient
with whom the sender has no existing business relationship, or
that was not requested, authorized, or consented to by the
recipient.
"Used motor vehicle dealer" has the same meaning as defined
in section 437-1.1.
2026-3407 HB1511 CDl HMSO


Page 7
H.B. NO. S’;
C.D. 1
"Vehicle manufacturer" has the same meaning as
"manufacturer" as defined in section 437-1.1. "Vehicle
manufacturer" includes "distributor" as defined in section
4372:1^"
SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3407 HB1511 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO. S’?
C.D, 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1511, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura .
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1511, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
62-26